Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1010
Mailboxes; location; violation; duty of Department of Transportation.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all mailboxes shall be placed such that no part of the mailbox extends beyond the shoulder line of any highway and the mailbox support shall be placed a minimum of one foot outside the shoulder line of any gravel-surfaced highway, and of any hard-surfaced highway having a shoulder width of six feet or more as measured from the edge of the hard surfacing. Along hard-surfaced highways having a shoulder width of less than six feet, the Department of Transportation shall, on new construction or reconstruction, where feasible, provide a shoulder width of not less than six feet, or provide for a minimum clear traffic lane of ten feet in width at mailbox turnouts. On highways built before October 9, 1961, having a shoulder width of less than six feet, the department may, where feasible and deemed advisable, provide a shoulder width of not less than six feet or provide for minimum clear traffic lane of ten feet in width at mailbox turnouts. For a hard-surfaced highway having either a mailbox turnout or a hard-surfaced shoulder width of eight feet or more, the mailbox shall be placed such that no part of the mailbox extends beyond the outside edge of the mailbox turnout or hard-surfaced portion of the shoulder and the mailbox support shall be placed a minimum of one foot outside the outside edge of the mailbox turnout or hard-surfaced portion of the shoulder.

(2) It shall be the duty of the department to notify the owner of all mailboxes in violation of the provisions of this section, and the department may remove such mailboxes if the owner fails or refuses to remove the same after a reasonable time after he or she is notified of such violations.

Laws 1961, c. 194, § 1, p. 593;

Laws 2014, LB757, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 117.